District of Columbia statutes.
8-634.11

Judicial review.

(a)

In considering a challenge made to a response action taken or ordered under this chapter, or the denial of all or part of a petition for reimbursement under this chapter, the court shall uphold the Mayor’s decision in selecting the response action unless the objecting party can demonstrate on the administrative record that the decision was arbitrary and capricious or otherwise not in accordance with District law.

(b)

If the court finds that the selection of the response action was arbitrary and capricious or otherwise not in accordance with District law, the court shall award only the response costs or damages that are consistent with the Hazardous Substances Response Plan and other relief as is consistent with the Hazardous Substances Response Plan.

(c)

In reviewing an alleged procedural error, the court may disallow the costs or damages only if the error was so serious and related to a matter of such central relevance to the action that the action would have been significantly changed had the error not been made.

(d)

The Mayor shall establish an administrative record upon which the Mayor shall base the selection of a non-emergency response action. The administrative record shall be available to the public, at a minimum, by scheduling an appointment to inspect the record during regular business hours at DDOE.

History

June 13, 2001, D.C. Law 13-312, § 411
as added Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-369, § 2(k), 58 DCR 996